Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-413
Waterworks; right-of-way outside corporate limits; purposes; conditions.

Any city or village in this state erecting, constructing, or maintaining a system of waterworks, or part of a system of waterworks, outside its corporate limits, is granted the right-of-way along any of the public roads of the state, along any of the streets and alleys of any city or village within the state, and over and through any of the lands which are the property of the state, for the laying, constructing, and maintaining of water mains, conduits, and aqueducts for the purpose of transporting or conveying water from such system of waterworks, or part of such system of waterworks, to such city or village erecting the same. Such city or village is granted such right-of-way for the further purpose of erecting and maintaining all necessary poles, wires, or conduits, for the purpose of transporting, transmitting, or conveying electric current from such city or village to such system of waterworks, or part of such system of waterworks, for power and light purposes. In constructing such water mains, conduits, and aqueducts for transporting water and such poles, wires, and conduits for transmitting electric current along the streets or alleys of any other city or village, such city or village shall construct and locate the same in accordance with existing ordinances of such other city or village pertaining thereto and shall be liable for any damage caused thereby. Such poles and wires shall be constructed so as not to interfere with the use of the public roadway, and such wires shall be placed at a height not less than twenty feet above all road crossings.

Laws 1931, c. 35, § 1, p. 127;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1301;

R.S.1943, § 18-413;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 29.